Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB216.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2871YC (1) 91 lh/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ DOUBLE 1 UP FOOD BUCKS PROGRAM ââ SUPPLEMENTAL APPROPRIATION. There 2 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 3 department of health and human services for the fiscal year 4 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, in addition 5 to any other funding appropriated for such purposes for the 6 same fiscal year, the following amount or so much thereof as is 7 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 8 To provide grants to support the double up food bucks 9 program administered by the Iowa healthiest state initiative 10 to make fresh fruits and vegetables sold at farmers markets, 11 grocery stores, and other participating locations accessible 12 to individuals and families who reside in this state and 13 receive assistance through the federal supplemental nutrition 14 assistance program: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 16 A grant recipient that receives funding pursuant to this 17 section shall provide at least a dollar-for-dollar match of the 18 grant assistance. 19 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated under this 20 section shall not revert at the close of the fiscal year, but 21 shall remain available for the purposes designated. 22 Sec. 2. SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ââ 23 ELIGIBLE FOODS. 24 1. The department of health and human services shall request 25 a waiver from the food and nutrition service of the United 26 States department of agriculture to provide that, for purposes 27 of state administration of the supplemental food and nutrition 28 program, eligible foods as defined in 7 C.F.R. Â§271.2 shall 29 only include items from the following categories: 30 a. Real eggs. 31 b. Real meat. 32 c. Real dairy. 33 d. Bread and grains. 34 e. All fruits and vegetables. 35 -1- LSB 2871YC (1) 91 lh/ko 1/ 3 H.F. _____ f. All cereals and hot cereals, including granola. 1 g. Peanut butter and nuts. 2 h. Pasta, rice, and legumes. 3 i. Any item as specified in the most current Iowa special 4 supplemental nutrition program for women, infants, and children 5 approved foods list published by the department of health and 6 human services. 7 2. All eligible foods may be fresh, frozen, canned, 8 preserved, made into spreads, or juiced. 9 3. For purposes of this section: 10 a. âReal dairyâ means the products made from the lacteal 11 secretion of a cow, goat, or sheep such as milk, cheese, and 12 yogurt. 13 b. âReal eggsâ means eggs laid by a bird such as a chicken, 14 and includes fresh eggs, dried egg mix, and pasteurized liquid 15 whole eggs. 16 c. âReal meatâ means the muscle tissue from an animal such 17 as a cow, pig, or fish. 18 4. The department of health and human services shall 19 implement the waiver upon receipt of approval of the waiver. 20 Sec. 3. CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE. The following takes 21 effect on the date the department of health and human services 22 receives federal approval of the waiver request relating to 23 supplemental nutrition assistance program eligible foods as 24 specified under this Act, if the waiver is approved: 25 The section of this Act making a supplemental appropriation 26 to the department of health and human services to provide 27 grants to support the double up food bucks program. 28